Wisconsin, session 2025, SB659.
do enact as follows:SB659,11Section 1. 110.11 of the statutes is created to read:SB659,2,72110.11 Speed limiter program. (1) The department shall implement a 3speed limiter program that will be conveniently available to persons throughout 4this state. To the extent practicable, the department shall treat the speed limiter 5program as an extension of the ignition interlock device program under s. 110.10 6and use existing ignition interlock device program infrastructure to support the 7speed limiter program. SB659,2,98(2) The department shall promulgate rules to implement the program under 9this section, including provisions regarding all of the following:SB659,2,1110(a) The selection of providers to install, service, and remove speed limiters on 11motor vehicles.SB659,2,1312(b) The periodic review of the fees charged to the owner of a vehicle for the 13installation, service, and removal of a speed limiter.SB659,2,1614(c) Requiring speed limiter providers operating in this state to provide the 15department and law enforcement agencies designated by the department with 16installation and service reports in a timely manner.SB659,3,41(d) Requiring speed limiter providers operating in this state to accept, as 2payment in full for equipping a motor vehicle with a speed limiter and for 3maintaining the speed limiter, the amount ordered by the court under s. 343.347 (4) 4(b), if applicable.SB659,3,65(e) Requiring speed limiter providers to notify the department of any speed 6limiter removal, disconnection, tampering, or circumvention. SB659,27Section 2. 340.01 (58m) of the statutes is created to read:SB659,3,98340.01 (58m) “Speed limiter” means an aftermarket device installed on a 9motor vehicle that prevents the motor vehicle from being operated above a set speed.SB659,310Section 3. 343.347 of the statutes is created to read:SB659,3,2111343.347 Installation of speed limiter. (1) If a person is convicted of a 12violation of s. 347.414 (2) or of a 2nd or subsequent violation of s. 346.62 (2), (2m), 13(3), or (4) in a 5-year period where the violations involved operating a motor vehicle 1420 or more miles per hour in excess of a lawful or posted speed limit, the court shall 15order that the person’s operating privilege for the operation of “Class D” vehicles be 16restricted to operating vehicles that are equipped with a speed limiter and, except 17as provided in sub. (2), shall order that each motor vehicle for which the person’s 18name appears on the vehicle’s certificate of title or registration be equipped with a 19speed limiter. The court may order that a person’s vehicle be limited to operation at 20a speed not to exceed posted speed limits or a maximum speed designated by the 21court.SB659,3,2422(2) (a) If equipping each motor vehicle with a speed limiter under sub. (1) 23would cause an undue financial hardship, the court may order that one or more 24vehicles described in sub. (1) not be equipped with a speed limiter.SB659,4,31(b) An order under sub. (1) does not apply to a vehicle for which the 2department has not approved a speed limiter capable of being installed on the 3vehicle.SB659,4,64(3) (a) If the court enters an order under sub. (1), the restriction of the 5person’s operating privilege under the order shall begin on the date the order is 6issued and extend for a period of not less than one year.SB659,4,107(b) Notwithstanding par. (a), if the court enters an order under sub. (1) for a 8person who has previously been subject to an order under sub. (1), the restriction of 9the person’s operating privilege under the order shall begin on the date the order is 10issued and extend for a period of not less than 2 years. SB659,4,1311(4) (a) If the court enters an order under sub. (1), the person shall be liable for 12the reasonable cost of equipping, maintaining, and removing any speed limiter 13installed on their motor vehicle.SB659,4,2214(b) The court shall limit the person’s liability under par. (a) to one-half of the 15cost of equipping, maintaining, and removing any speed limiter installed on their 16motor vehicle if the court finds that the person who is subject to an order under sub. 17(1) has a household income that is at or below 150 percent of the poverty line, as 18defined in 42 USC 9902 (2), is receiving supplemental security income under 42 19USC 1381 to 1385, or is receiving benefits under the temporary assistance for needy 20families program under 42 USC 601 to 619, the supplemental nutrition assistance 21program under 7 USC 2011 to 2036, or the low income home energy assistance 22program under 42 USC 8621 to 8630.SB659,5,223(5) A person to whom an order under sub. (1) applies violates that order if 24they fail to have a speed limiter installed as ordered, if they remove or disconnect a 1speed limiter, or if they otherwise tamper with or circumvent the operation of the 2speed limiter.SB659,43Section 4. 347.414 of the statutes is created to read:SB659,5,114347.414 Speed limiter circumvention; failure to install. (1) No person 5may remove, disconnect, tamper with, or otherwise circumvent the operation of a 6speed limiter installed in response to a court order under s. 343.347 (1), fail to have 7the speed limiter installed as ordered by the court, or violate a court order under s. 8343.347 (1) restricting the person’s operating privilege. This subsection does not 9apply to the removal of a speed limiter upon the expiration of the order requiring 10the motor vehicle to be so equipped or to necessary repairs to a malfunctioning 11speed limiter by a provider authorized by the department.SB659,5,1512(2) A person may not authorize the operation of a motor vehicle that the 13person owns, leases, or rents by another person who is subject to a court order 14under s. 343.347 (1). This subsection applies only if the owner, lessee, or renter of 15the motor vehicle has knowledge of the court order under s. 343.347 (1).SB659,516Section 5. 347.50 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB659,5,2017347.50 (1) Any person violating ss. 347.35 to 347.49, except s. 347.385 (5), s. 18347.413 (1) or 347.414 or s. 347.415 (1m), (2) and (3) to (5) or s. 347.417 (1) or s. 19347.475 or s. 347.48 (2m) or (4) or s. 347.489, may be required to forfeit not less than 20$10 nor more than $200.SB659,621Section 6. 347.50 (1s) of the statutes is amended to read:SB659,6,222347.50 (1s) Any person violating s. 347.413 (1), 347.414, or 347.417 (1) may be 23fined not less than $150 nor more than $600, or may be imprisoned for not more 24than 6 months, or both for the first offense. For a 2nd or subsequent conviction 1within 5 years, the person may be fined not less than $300 nor more than $1,000, or 2imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or both.SB659,6,33